Illinois, session 104th, SB1982.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Dental Practice Act is amended by 5changing Sections 4 and 13.10 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 25/4)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 10by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 11file or license file as maintained by the Department's 12licensure maintenance unit. It is the duty of the applicant or 13licensee to inform the Department of any change of address and 14those changes must be made either through the Department's 15website or by contacting the Department. 16    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 17Professional Regulation.18    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 19Professional Regulation.20    "Board" means the Board of Dentistry.21    "Dentist" means a person who has received a general 22license pursuant to subsection paragraph (a) of Section 11 of 23this Act and who may perform any intraoral and extraoral   SB1982- 2 -LRB104 09121 AAS 19177 b1procedure required in the practice of dentistry and to whom is 2reserved the responsibilities specified in Section 17.3    "Dental hygienist" means a person who holds a license 4under this Act to perform dental services as authorized by 5Section 18.6    "Dental assistant" means an appropriately trained person 7who, under the supervision of a dentist, provides dental 8services as authorized by Section 17.9    "Expanded function dental assistant" means a dental 10assistant who has completed the training required by Section 1117.1 of this Act. 12    "Dental laboratory" means a person, firm, or corporation 13which:14        (i) engages in making, providing, repairing, or 15    altering dental prosthetic appliances and other artificial 16    materials and devices which are returned to a dentist for 17    insertion into the human oral cavity or which come in 18    contact with its adjacent structures and tissues; and19        (ii) utilizes or employs a dental technician to 20    provide such services; and21        (iii) performs such functions only for a dentist or 22    dentists.23    "Supervision" means supervision of a dental hygienist or a 24dental assistant requiring that a dentist authorize the 25procedure, remain in the dental facility while the procedure 26is performed, and approve the work performed by the dental   SB1982- 3 -LRB104 09121 AAS 19177 b1hygienist or dental assistant before dismissal of the patient, 2but does not mean that the dentist must be present at all times 3in the treatment room.4    "General supervision" means supervision of a dental 5hygienist requiring that the patient be a patient of record, 6that the dentist examine the patient in accordance with 7Section 18 prior to treatment by the dental hygienist, and 8that the dentist authorize the procedures which are being 9carried out by a notation in the patient's record, but not 10requiring that a dentist be present when the authorized 11procedures are being performed. The issuance of a prescription 12to a dental laboratory by a dentist does not constitute 13general supervision.14    "Public member" means a person who is not a health 15professional. For purposes of board membership, any person 16with a significant financial interest in a health service or 17profession is not a public member.18    "Dentistry" means the healing art which is concerned with 19the examination, diagnosis, treatment planning, and care of 20conditions within the human oral cavity and its adjacent 21tissues and structures, as further specified in Section 17.22    "Branches of dentistry" means the various specialties of 23dentistry which, for purposes of this Act, shall be limited to 24the following: endodontics, oral and maxillofacial surgery, 25orthodontics and dentofacial orthopedics, pediatric dentistry, 26periodontics, prosthodontics, oral and maxillofacial   SB1982- 4 -LRB104 09121 AAS 19177 b1radiology, and dental anesthesiology.2    "Specialist" means a dentist who has received a specialty 3license pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 11 11(b).4    "Dental technician" means a person who owns, operates, or 5is employed by a dental laboratory and engages in making, 6providing, repairing, or altering dental prosthetic appliances 7and other artificial materials and devices which are returned 8to a dentist for insertion into the human oral cavity or which 9come in contact with its adjacent structures and tissues.10    "Informed consent" means legally valid consent that is 11given by a patient or legal guardian, that is recorded in 12writing or digitally, that authorizes intervention or 13treatment services from the treating dentist, and that 14documents agreement to participate in those services and 15knowledge of the risks, benefits, and alternatives, including 16the decision to withdraw from or decline treatment. 17    "Impaired dentist" or "impaired dental hygienist" means a 18dentist or dental hygienist who is unable to practice with 19reasonable skill and safety because of a physical or mental 20disability as evidenced by a written determination or written 21consent based on clinical evidence, including deterioration 22through the aging process, loss of motor skills, abuse of 23drugs or alcohol, or a psychiatric disorder, of sufficient 24degree to diminish the person's ability to deliver competent 25patient care.26    "Nurse" means a registered professional nurse, a certified   SB1982- 5 -LRB104 09121 AAS 19177 b1registered nurse anesthetist licensed as an advanced practice 2registered nurse, or a licensed practical nurse licensed under 3the Nurse Practice Act.4    "Patient of record", except as provided in Section 17.2, 5means a patient for whom the patient's most recent dentist has 6obtained a relevant medical and dental history and on whom the 7dentist has performed a physical examination within the last 8year and evaluated the condition to be treated, including a 9review of the patient's most recent x-rays.10    "Dental responder" means a dentist or dental hygienist who 11is appropriately certified in disaster preparedness, 12immunizations, and dental humanitarian medical response 13consistent with the Society of Disaster Medicine and Public 14Health and training certified by the National Incident 15Management System or the National Disaster Life Support 16Foundation. 17    "Mobile dental van or portable dental unit" means any 18self-contained or portable dental unit in which dentistry is 19practiced that can be moved, towed, or transported from one 20location to another in order to establish a location where 21dental services can be provided.22    "Public health dental hygienist" means a hygienist who 23holds a valid license to practice in the State, has 2 years of 24full-time clinical experience or an equivalent of 4,000 hours 25of clinical experience, and has completed at least 42 clock 26hours of additional structured courses in dental education in   SB1982- 6 -LRB104 09121 AAS 19177 b1advanced areas specific to public health dentistry.2    "Public health setting" means a federally qualified health 3center; a federal, State, or local public health facility; 4Head Start; a special supplemental nutrition program for 5Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) facility; a certified 6school-based health center or school-based oral health 7program; a prison; or a long-term care facility.8    "Public health supervision" means the supervision of a 9public health dental hygienist by a licensed dentist who has a 10written public health supervision agreement with that public 11health dental hygienist while working in an approved facility 12or program that allows the public health dental hygienist to 13treat patients, without a dentist first examining the patient 14and being present in the facility during treatment, (1) who 15are eligible for Medicaid or (2) who are uninsured or whose 16household income is not greater than 300% of the federal 17poverty level. 18    "Teledentistry" means the use of telehealth systems and 19methodologies in dentistry and includes patient diagnosis, 20treatment planning, care, and education delivery for a patient 21of record using synchronous and asynchronous communications 22under an Illinois licensed dentist's authority as provided 23under this Act.24    "Moderate sedation" means a drug-induced depression of 25consciousness during which: (1) patients respond purposefully 26to verbal commands, either alone or accompanied by light   SB1982- 7 -LRB104 09121 AAS 19177 b1tactile stimulation; (2) no interventions are required to 2maintain a patient's airway and spontaneous ventilation is 3adequate; and (3) cardiovascular function is usually 4maintained.5    "Deep sedation" means a drug-induced depression of 6consciousness during which: (1) patients cannot be easily 7aroused, but respond purposefully following repeated or 8painful stimulation; (2) the ability to independently maintain 9ventilatory function may be impaired; (3) patients may require 10assistance in maintaining airways and spontaneous ventilation 11may be inadequate; and (4) cardiovascular function is usually 12maintained.13    "General anesthesia" means a drug-induced loss of 14consciousness during which: (1) patients are not arousable, 15even by painful stimulation; (2) the ability to independently 16maintain ventilatory function is often impaired; (3) patients 17often require assistance in maintaining airways and positive 18pressure ventilation may be required because of depressed 19spontaneous ventilation or drug-induced depression of 20neuromuscular function; and (4) cardiovascular function may be 21impaired.22    "Venipuncture" means the puncture of a vein as part of a 23medical procedure, typically to withdraw a blood sample or for 24an intravenous catheter for the administration of medication 25or fluids.26    "Enteral route of administration" means administration of   SB1982- 8 -LRB104 09121 AAS 19177 b1a drug that is absorbed through the gastrointestinal tract or 2through oral, rectal, or sublingual mucosa.3    "Parenteral route of administration" means administration 4of a drug by which the drug bypasses the gastrointestinal 5tract through intramuscular, intravenous, intranasal, 6submucosal, subcutaneous, or intraosseous methods. 7(Source: P.A. 102-93, eff. 1-1-22; 102-588, eff. 8-20-21; 8102-936, eff. 1-1-23; 103-425, eff. 1-1-24; 103-431, eff. 91-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-628, eff. 7-1-24; 103-902, 10eff. 8-9-24; revised 10-10-24.) 11    (225 ILCS 25/13.10)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 13.10. Public health dental hygienist supervision 14agreement. After completion of the requirements of Section 1513.5, a public health dental hygienist may provide services 16according to the terms of the supervision agreement with 17operate in a public health setting that meets the requirements 18of Section 18.1 with a dentist who is working in or has 19contracted with a local or State government agency or 20institution or who is providing services as part of a 21certified school-based program or school-based oral health 22program. Care provided by a public health dental hygienist 23under a supervision agreement may take place in any setting 24outside of a private dental office. 25(Source: P.A. 101-64, eff. 7-12-19.)